Arkansas, session 2025, HB1058.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 8, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-8-311. Advance notice of inspections prohibited.
(a) A public servant shall not provide an entity subject to inspection
by a governmental body advance notice of a complaint-based inspection that is
outside of the notice regularly provided to all persons before an inspection.
(b)(1) A person convicted under this section shall thereafter be
ineligible to hold any office or employment in any of the departments in this
state.
(2)(A) If a person is convicted under this section while
employed by any of the departments of this state, he or she shall be removed
*LGL014*
01-16-2025 15:23:28 LGL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1058
from employment immediately.
(B) If a person is convicted under this section while holding
public office, the conviction also shall be deemed a misfeasance and
malfeasance in office and shall subject the person to impeachment.

/s/Unger






























01-16-2025 15:23:28 LGL014